Hawaii statutes.
§668-10 Allotments for shares under
unproved ownership. In any case where the legal title of a claimant to any
particular share or interest has not been shown to the satisfaction of the
court but the claimant has color of title thereto and the claim is not
controverted, the court may in the general partition allot and set apart, for
the benefit and account of the legal owner or owners of the share when
ascertained, such a portion or portions of the property as the legal owner or
owners of the share would be entitled to receive, to be finally disposed of as
hereinafter provided; or similarly, the court may set aside a corresponding
portion of the proceeds of any sale thereof, for like disposition thereafter.
In either case the court may then proceed with partition of the remainder as
herein otherwise provided. [L 1923, c 178, §10; RL 1925, §2770; RL 1935, §4749;
RL 1945, §12459; RL 1955, §337-10; HRS §668-10]

Cross References

Disposition, where title in doubt, see §668-15.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next